Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.027

Bill drafting service.

The reviser shall be in charge of and shall at all times maintain an expert bill drafting service for the use and benefit of the legislature, its committees and its members. Prior to any session thereof, the legislature shall provide quarters convenient to both houses and shall augment the reviser's staff with such additional legal and clerical assistance as may be needed to carry out the bill drafting functions of the legislature and pay the cost of such additional staff. Such services shall be confidential and nonpartisan and no member of the bill drafting staff shall advocate for or against any legislative measure.

[ 1953 c 257 s 6; 1951 c 157 s 12.]

NOTES:

Initiative measures, review by code reviser: RCW 29A.72.020.